Hawaii statutes.
§23-11 New special or revolving
funds. (a) Within five days after the deadline for the introduction of
bills in each legislative session, the clerks of each house of the legislature
shall transmit, to the auditor for analysis, copies of all legislative bills
that were introduced in their respective houses during that session that
propose to establish new special or revolving funds.

(b) The criteria to be used by the auditor in
analyzing each legislative bill shall include:

(1) The need for the fund, as demonstrated by:

(A) The purpose of the program to be supported
by the fund;

(B) The scope of the program, including
financial information on fees to be charged, sources of projected revenue, and
costs; and

(C) An explanation of why the program cannot
be implemented successfully under the general fund appropriation process; and

(2) Whether there is a clear nexus between the
benefits sought and charges made upon the program users or beneficiaries or a
clear link between the program and the sources of revenue, as opposed to
serving primarily as a means to provide the program or users with an automatic
means of support that is removed from the normal budget and appropriation
process.

Each analysis shall set forth the probable effects
of the proposed fund and shall also assess alternative forms of funding.

(c) No later than thirty days prior to the
adjournment sine die of each legislative session, the auditor shall submit the
analysis of each transmitted legislative bill to each house of the legislature.
[L 1990, c 240, §2; am L 2013, c 130, §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as addition to chapter 36 but is
renumbered to this chapter pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next